Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4223.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1308g. (1) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the governing body of a public school or, subject to subsection (2), the governing body of a nonpublic school shall develop or adopt, and implement, a school safety and security training plan as described in section 1308f, and shall ensure that school resource officers placed in the public school or nonpublic school, school safety or security personnel who work at or for the public school or nonpublic school, members of a crisis response team described in section 1308b, and all school staff of the public school or nonpublic school complete the training described in section 1308f, as applicable. (2) The governing body of a nonpublic school may elect to exempt the nonpublic school from the requirements of this section. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law. (a) House Bill No. 4222. (b) House Bill No. 4315.